Colorado, session 2026A, HB1203.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-205, amend (3)
as follows:
1-4-205. County commissioners.
(3) (a) In each county having a population of seventy thousand or
more, the board of county commissioners may MUST consist either of
three members, any two of whom shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business, or of five members, any three of whom shall
constitute a quorum for the transaction of business; EXCEPT THAT THE
REQUIREMENT TO HAVE A BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS CONSIST OF
FIVE MEMBERS DOES NOT APPLY TO A HOME RULE COUNTY THAT ELECTS
-2- 1203

MORE THAN HALF OF ITS COUNTY COMMISSIONERS BY A DISTRICT METHOD
OF ELECTION, SUCH THAT THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS ARE RESIDENT IN
DISTRICTS AND ARE ELECTED BY VOTERS RESIDENT IN THOSE DISTRICTS.
(b) If the board consists of three commissioners, they shall MUST
be elected as provided in subsection (2) of this section and as provided in
section 30-10-306.7 (5), C.R.S. BY DISTRICT ONLY, IN WHICH THE THREE
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS RESIDENT IN THREE DISTRICTS ARE ELECTED BY
VOTERS RESIDENT IN THOSE DISTRICTS.
(c) In any county having a population of seventy thousand or
more, the membership of the board of county commissioners may be
increased from three to five members pursuant to section 30-10-306.5,
C.R.S., or decreased from five to three members pursuant to section
30-10-306.7 (2)(a)(II), C.R.S. SECTION 30-10-306.8.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-801, amend
(2)(e) introductory portion, (2)(e)(II) introductory portion, (2)(e)(II)(B),
and (2)(f) as follows:
1-4-801. Designation of party candidates by petition.
(2) The signature requirements for the petition are as follows:
(e) Where the electors of the county have voted to increase WHEN
A COUNTY HAVING A POPULATION OF SEVENTY THOUSAND OR MORE
INCREASES the membership of the board of county commissioners from
three to five pursuant to section 30-10-306.5, C.R.S., or to decrease the
membership of the board from five to three pursuant to section
30-10-306.7, C.R.S., TO COMPLY WITH SECTIONS 1-4-205 (3) AND
30-10-306.8, for the next two primary elections immediately following an
election at which the voters have approved the change in the membership
-3- 1203

of the board, the signature requirements for the petition are as follows:
(II) Where any one or more commissioners to be elected to the
board of county commissioners will be voted on only by the electors
residing in a particular county commissioner district, the determination of
the required number of signers must begin with a calculation of the
average of all votes cast in each commissioner district in the county
during the prior two contested or uncontested primary elections for the
political party's candidates in the county commissioner districts that held
a primary election in either of those elections. Upon a determination of
the average, that number must then be divided by the total number of
commissioner districts in the county where commissioners are voted on
only by the electors residing in the district. whether three or five After
completing this calculation, every petition must require signers equal in
number to twenty percent of the number realized. If no primary election
was held in either year, the calculation must be based on the most recent
preceding general election for which the party had a candidate on the
ballot, and every petition must require signers equal in number to the
following calculation:
(B) Divide the number found in sub-subparagraph (A) of this
subparagraph (II) SUBSECTION (2)(e)(II)(A) OF THIS SECTION by the total
number of commissioner districts in the county where commissioners are
voted on only by the electors residing in the district. whether three or five
(f) Following the first two primary elections that are conducted
after a change in the membership of the board of county commissioners
pursuant to section 30-10-306.5 or 30-10-306.7, C.R.S. SECTIONS 1-4-205
(3) AND 30-10-306.8, in accordance with the requirements of paragraph
(e) of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(e) OF THIS SECTION, the
-4- 1203

signature requirements for a petition for a county commissioner candidate
who is affiliated with a major political party must follow the procedures
specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 1-4-802, amend (2)
introductory portion, (2)(b)(II), and (2)(c); and repeal (3) as follows:
1-4-802. Petitions for nominating minor political party and
unaffiliated candidates for a partisan office.
(2) Where the electors of the county have voted to increase WHEN
A COUNTY HAVING A POPULATION OF SEVENTY THOUSAND OR MORE
INCREASES the membership of the board of county commissioners from
three to five pursuant to section 30-10-306.5, C.R.S., or to decrease the
membership of the board from five to three pursuant to section
30-10-306.7, C.R.S., TO COMPLY WITH SECTIONS 1-4-205 (3) AND
30-10-306.8, for the next two general elections immediately following an
election at which the voters have approved a THE change in the
membership of the board, the signature requirements for the petition to
select candidates who do not wish to affiliate with a major political party
are as follows:
(b) Where any one or more commissioners to be elected to the
board of county commissioners will be voted on only by the electors
residing in a particular county commissioner district, every petition must
require signers equal in number to the lesser of either:
(II) The number realized by first determining two percent of the
average of all votes cast in each county commissioner district for which
there was a race on the ballot during the most recent general election, and
then dividing that number by the total number of commissioner districts
-5- 1203

in the county where commissioners are voted on only by the electors
residing in a district. whether three or five
(c) Following the first two general elections that are conducted
after a THE change in the membership of the board of county
commissioners, pursuant to section 30-10-306.5 or 30-10-306.7, C.R.S.,
the signature requirements for a petition for a county commissioner
candidate who does not wish to affiliate with a major political party must
follow the procedures specified in: subparagraph (VI) of paragraph (c) of
subsection (1)
(I) SUBSECTION (1)(c)(VI) of this section, IF THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS ARE ELECTED BY DISTRICT ONLY AS DESCRIBED IN
SECTION 30-10-306.8 (3); OR
(II) SUBSECTION (1)(c)(VII) OF THIS SECTION, IF THE COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS ARE ELECTED BY A COMBINATION OF AT-LARGE AND
BY-DISTRICT VOTING METHODS AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 30-10-306.8 (4).
(3) Following the first two general elections that are conducted
after a change in the membership of the board of county commissioners
pursuant to section 30-10-306.5 or 30-10-306.7, C.R.S., the signature
requirements for a petition for a county commissioner candidate who does
not wish to affiliate with a major political party must follow the
procedures specified in subparagraph (VI) of paragraph (c) of subsection
(1) of this section.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 30-10-306, amend
(1) and (2) as follows:
30-10-306. Commissioners' districts - vacancies - definitions.
(1) Each county HAVING A POPULATION OF LESS THAN SEVENTY
THOUSAND must be divided into three compact districts by the board of
-6- 1203

county commissioners. Each district must be as nearly equal in population
as possible based on the redistricting population data prepared by staff of
the legislative council and office of legislative legal services, or any
successor offices, in accordance with section 2-2-902. In no event shall
there be more than five percent deviation between the most populous and
the least populous district in each county, at the time such district
boundaries are adopted. Each district must be numbered consecutively
and must not be subject to alteration more often than once every two
years. One county commissioner must be elected from each of such
districts DISTRICT by the voters of the whole county. If any county
commissioner, during his or her THEIR term of office, moves from the
district in which he or she THEY resided when elected, his or her THE
COMMISSIONER'S office thereupon becomes vacant. All proceedings by the
board of county commissioners in formation of such districts not
inconsistent with this section are confirmed and validated.
(2) Each county having a population of seventy thousand or more
that has chosen to increase the members of the board of county
commissioners from three to five must be divided into three or five
districts. by the board of county commissioners according to the method
of election described in section 30-10-306.5 (5) or (6) or section
30-10-306.7. When applicable, the board of county commissioners shall
divide the county into districts in accordance with the final redistricting
plan approved in accordance with section 30-10-306.4. The districts must
be as nearly equal in population as possible based on the redistricting
population data prepared by staff of the legislative council and office of
legislative legal services, or any successor offices, in accordance with
section 2-2-902. In no event shall there be more than five percent
-7- 1203

deviation between the most populous and the least populous district in
each county, at the time such district boundaries are adopted. Each district
must be numbered consecutively and is not subject to alteration more
often than once every two years; except that, notwithstanding subsection
(3) of this section, the board may alter the districts to conform to precinct
boundaries that are changed in accordance with section 1-5-103 (1), based
on the division of the state into congressional districts or an approved
plan for redistricting of the members of the general assembly when
necessary to ensure that no precinct is located in more than one district.
County commissioners are elected at large or from districts according to
the method of election described in section 30-10-306.5 (5) or (6) or
section 30-10-306.7 SECTION 1-4-205 (3)(b) OR SECTION 30-10-306.8 (3)
OR (4). If any county commissioner required to be resident in a district
moves during his or her THEIR term of office from the district in which he
or she THEY resided when elected, his or her THE COMMISSIONER'S office
thereupon becomes vacant. All proceedings by the board of county
commissioners in formation of such districts not inconsistent with this
section are confirmed and validated.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 30-10-306.5
and 30-10-306.7.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 30-10-306.8 as
follows:
30-10-306.8. Methods of election for five county
commissioners in a county with a population of seventy thousand or
more - elections - redistricting.
(1) IN ANY COUNTY HAVING A POPULATION OF SEVENTY
THOUSAND OR MORE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD OF COUNTY
-8- 1203

COMMISSIONERS MAY BE INCREASED FROM THREE TO FIVE MEMBERS
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1.5) OF THIS SECTION. IF THE BOARD CONSISTS
OF FIVE MEMBERS, THE FIVE MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS MUST BE ELECTED BY ONE OF THE FOLLOWING METHODS:
(a) BY DISTRICT ONLY, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS
SECTION; OR
(b) BY A COMBINATION OF AT-LARGE AND BY-DISTRICT VOTING
METHODS, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION.
(1.5) (a) IN ANY COUNTY HAVING A POPULATION OF SEVENTY
THOUSAND OR MORE WHOSE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS CONSISTS
OF THREE MEMBERS, THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL
ADOPT A RESOLUTION INCREASING ITS MEMBERSHIP TO FIVE MEMBERS AND
DESIGNATING THE TWO ALTERNATIVE METHODS OF ELECTING ITS FIVE
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS (3) AND (4) OF THIS
SECTION. THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL PASS THE
RESOLUTION AT ITS FIRST REGULARLY SCHEDULED MEETING IN EACH
DECENNIAL CENSUS YEAR.
(b) THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL REFER THE
RESOLUTION REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
REGISTERED ELECTORS OF THE COUNTY AT THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION
FOLLOWING ITS ADOPTION SO THAT THE VOTERS MAY CHOOSE WHETHER
TO INCREASE THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS
TO FIVE MEMBERS AND, IF INCREASED, WHICH OF THE TWO ALTERNATIVE
METHODS OF ELECTING COUNTY COMMISSIONERS THE VOTERS PREFER.
(c) IF A MAJORITY OF VOTES CAST ARE IN FAVOR OF THE REFERRED
RESOLUTION DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1.5), THE BOARD OF COUNTY
COMMISSIONERS SHALL TAKE ACTION TO ENSURE THAT THE INCREASED
-9- 1203

NUMBER OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS ARE ELECTED AT THE NEXT GENERAL
ELECTION ACCORDING TO THE METHOD OF ELECTION IN THE REFERRED
RESOLUTION THAT RECEIVED THE LARGEST NUMBER OF VOTES CAST.
(2) (a) (I) IN ANY COUNTY HAVING A POPULATION OF SEVENTY
THOUSAND OR MORE WHOSE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS CONSISTS
OF FIVE MEMBERS, THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL ADOPT
A RESOLUTION DESIGNATING THE TWO ALTERNATIVE METHODS OF
ELECTING ITS FIVE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SET FORTH IN SUBSECTIONS
(3) AND (4) OF THIS SECTION. THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS
SHALL PASS THE RESOLUTION NO LATER THAN ITS FIRST REGULARLY
SCHEDULED MEETING IN CALENDAR YEAR 2027.
(II) THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL REFER THE
RESOLUTION REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a) TO THE REGISTERED
ELECTORS OF THE COUNTY AT THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING
ITS ADOPTION SO THAT THE VOTERS MAY CHOOSE WHICH OF THE TWO
ALTERNATIVE METHODS OF ELECTING COUNTY COMMISSIONERS THEY
PREFER. THEREAFTER, THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL
TAKE ACTION TO ENSURE THAT COUNTY COMMISSIONERS ARE ELECTED AT
THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION ACCORDING TO THE METHOD OF ELECTION
IN THE REFERRED RESOLUTION THAT RECEIVED THE LARGEST NUMBER OF
VOTES CAST.
(b) A COUNTY HAVING A POPULATION OF SEVENTY THOUSAND OR
MORE THAT ALREADY ELECTS ITS FIVE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS
ACCORDING TO ONE OF THE TWO ALTERNATIVE METHODS OF ELECTION SET
FORTH IN SUBSECTION (3) OR (4) OF THIS SECTION IS NOT REQUIRED TO
PASS THE RESOLUTION OTHERWISE REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION.
-10- 1203

(c) (I) A BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY ADOPT A
RESOLUTION CHANGING THE METHOD OF ELECTING THE MEMBERS OF THE
BOARD FROM ONE ALTERNATIVE METHOD OF ELECTION PROVIDED IN
SUBSECTION (3) OR (4) OF THIS SECTION TO THE OTHER METHOD, AND
SHALL REFER THE RESOLUTION TO THE REGISTERED ELECTORS OF THE
COUNTY AT THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING ITS ADOPTION. IF
A MAJORITY OF VOTES CAST ARE IN FAVOR OF THE RESOLUTION, THE
BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL TAKE SUCH ACTION AS IS
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS ARE ELECTED
AT THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION ACCORDING TO THE PROCEDURE FOR
ELECTION CONTAINED IN THE RESOLUTION.
(II) ALTERNATIVELY, A PETITION SIGNED BY AT LEAST FIVE
PERCENT OF THE TOTAL NUMBER OF QUALIFIED ELECTORS OF A COUNTY
VOTING FOR ALL CANDIDATES FOR THE OFFICE OF SECRETARY OF STATE AT
THE LAST PRECEDING GENERAL ELECTION IS SUFFICIENT TO PLACE ON THE
BALLOT AT A GENERAL ELECTION THE QUESTION OF WHETHER TO CHANGE
THE METHOD OF ELECTING MEMBERS OF THE BOARD FROM ONE
ALTERNATIVE METHOD OF ELECTION PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (3) OR (4)
OF THIS SECTION TO THE OTHER METHOD. THE PETITION MUST SPECIFY THE
CURRENT METHOD OF ELECTION AND THE PROPOSED ALTERNATIVE
METHOD OF ELECTION. THE PETITION MUST BE DELIVERED TO THE COUNTY
CLERK AND RECORDER PRIOR TO THE NINETIETH DAY BEFORE THE NEXT
GENERAL ELECTION WITH A REQUEST THAT THE QUESTION BE PLACED ON
THE BALLOT FOR REFERRAL TO THE REGISTERED ELECTORS OF THE COUNTY
AT THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION.
(3) (a) FIVE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS RESIDENT IN FIVE DISTRICTS
MAY BE ELECTED BY VOTERS RESIDENT IN THOSE DISTRICTS, AS SPECIFIED
-11- 1203

IN THIS SUBSECTION (3). EACH COUNTY COMMISSIONER SEAT TO WHICH A
COMMISSIONER WAS ELECTED BY VOTERS RESIDENT IN THE DISTRICT
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) MUST BE FILLED BY THE DISTRICT
METHOD OF ELECTION. IF ANY COUNTY COMMISSIONER, DURING THE
COMMISSIONER'S TERM OF OFFICE, MOVES FROM THE DISTRICT IN WHICH
THE COMMISSIONER RESIDED WHEN ELECTED, THE COMMISSIONER'S OFFICE
BECOMES VACANT.
(b) IF A COUNTY ADOPTS THE DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) BUT IS NOT DIVIDED INTO FIVE COUNTY
COMMISSIONER DISTRICTS, THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL
CHANGE THE BOUNDARIES OF THE COMMISSIONERS' DISTRICTS TO CREATE
FIVE DISTRICTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SECTION
30-10-306 (2) AND THE COUNTY'S FINAL REDISTRICTING PLAN APPROVED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 30-10-306.4.
(c) (I) IF THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION AFTER THE VOTERS'
SELECTION OF THE DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION IS HELD IN 2028 OR ANY
FOURTH YEAR THEREAFTER, THREE MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST
BE ELECTED TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS AT THAT GENERAL ELECTION AND TWO
MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST BE ELECTED TO TWO-YEAR TERMS
UNTIL THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION, AT WHICH TWO MEMBERS RESIDENT
IN DISTRICTS MUST BE ELECTED TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS. THEREAFTER,
THREE MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST BE ELECTED AT THE
GENERAL ELECTIONS WHICH OCCUR EACH FOUR YEARS AFTER THE FIRST
GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE SELECTION OF THE DISTRICT METHOD
OF ELECTION, AND TWO MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST BE
ELECTED AT THE GENERAL ELECTION WHICH OCCURS TWO YEARS AFTER
THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE SELECTION OF THE
-12- 1203

DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION AND EVERY FOURTH YEAR THEREAFTER.
(II) IF THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION AFTER THE VOTERS'
SELECTION OF THE DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION IS HELD IN 2030 OR ANY
FOURTH YEAR THEREAFTER, TWO MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST
BE ELECTED TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS AT THAT GENERAL ELECTION AND
THREE MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST BE ELECTED TO TWO-YEAR
TERMS UNTIL THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION, AT WHICH THREE MEMBERS
RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST BE ELECTED TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS.
THEREAFTER, TWO MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST BE ELECTED AT
THE GENERAL ELECTIONS WHICH OCCUR EACH FOUR YEARS AFTER THE
FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE SELECTION OF THE DISTRICT
METHOD OF ELECTION, AND THREE MEMBERS RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS MUST
BE ELECTED AT THE GENERAL ELECTION WHICH OCCURS TWO YEARS AFTER
THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE SELECTION OF THE
DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION AND EVERY FOURTH YEAR THEREAFTER.
(III) BY MARCH 1 OF THE YEAR OF THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION
AFTER THE VOTERS' SELECTION OF THE DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION,
THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL DESIGNATE THE DISTRICTS
FROM WHICH A COMMISSIONER IS TO BE ELECTED TO AN INITIAL TWO-YEAR
TERM DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (3)(c).
(4) (a) THREE COMMISSIONERS RESIDENT IN THREE DISTRICTS AND
ELECTED BY VOTERS RESIDENT IN THOSE DISTRICTS AND TWO
COMMISSIONERS ELECTED AT LARGE.
(b) (I) IF THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION AFTER THE ADOPTION OF
THE AT-LARGE AND BY-DISTRICT COMBINATION METHOD OF ELECTION SET
FORTH IN THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS HELD IN 2028 OR ANY FOURTH YEAR
THEREAFTER, TWO MEMBERS MUST BE ELECTED BY DISTRICT AND ONE
-13- 1203

MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS AT THAT
ELECTION. ONE MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED BY DISTRICT AND ONE MEMBER
MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE AT THAT ELECTION TO TWO-YEAR TERMS
UNTIL THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION, AT WHICH THOSE TWO MEMBERS
MUST BE ELECTED TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS BY THEIR RESPECTIVE ELECTION
METHOD. THEREAFTER, TWO MEMBERS MUST BE ELECTED BY DISTRICT
AND ONE MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE AT THE GENERAL
ELECTIONS THAT OCCUR EVERY FOUR YEARS AFTER THE FIRST GENERAL
ELECTION FOLLOWING THE ADOPTION OF THE COMBINATION METHOD OF
ELECTION; AND TWO MEMBERS MUST BE ELECTED, ONE BY DISTRICT AND
ONE AT LARGE, AT THE GENERAL ELECTIONS THAT OCCUR EVERY FOUR
YEARS AFTER THE GENERAL ELECTION THAT OCCURS TWO YEARS AFTER
THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE ADOPTION OF THE
AT-LARGE AND BY-DISTRICT COMBINATION METHOD OF ELECTION.
(II) IF THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION AFTER THE ADOPTION OF THE
AT-LARGE AND BY-DISTRICT COMBINATION METHOD OF ELECTION SET
FORTH IN THIS SUBSECTION (4) IS HELD IN 2030 OR ANY FOURTH YEAR
THEREAFTER, ONE MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED BY DISTRICT AND ONE
MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS AT THAT
ELECTION. TWO MEMBERS MUST BE ELECTED BY DISTRICT AND ONE
MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE AT THAT ELECTION TO TWO-YEAR
TERMS UNTIL THE NEXT GENERAL ELECTION, AT WHICH THOSE THREE
MEMBERS MUST BE ELECTED TO FOUR-YEAR TERMS BY THEIR RESPECTIVE
ELECTION METHOD. THEREAFTER, ONE MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED BY
DISTRICT AND ONE MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE AT THE GENERAL
ELECTIONS THAT OCCUR EVERY FOUR YEARS AFTER THE FIRST GENERAL
ELECTION FOLLOWING THE ADOPTION OF THE COMBINATION METHOD OF
-14- 1203

ELECTION; AND TWO MEMBERS MUST BE ELECTED BY DISTRICT AND ONE
MEMBER MUST BE ELECTED AT LARGE AT THE GENERAL ELECTIONS THAT
OCCUR EVERY FOUR YEARS AFTER THE GENERAL ELECTION THAT OCCURS
TWO YEARS AFTER THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION FOLLOWING THE
ADOPTION OF THE AT-LARGE AND BY-DISTRICT COMBINATION METHOD OF
ELECTION.
(III) BY MARCH 1 OF THE YEAR OF THE FIRST GENERAL ELECTION
AFTER THE VOTERS' SELECTION OF THE AT-LARGE AND BY-DISTRICT
COMBINATION METHOD OF ELECTION DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION (4),
THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS SHALL DESIGNATE THE BY
DISTRICT AND AT-LARGE POSITIONS FROM WHICH A COMMISSIONER IS TO
BE ELECTED TO AN INITIAL TWO-YEAR TERM AS DESCRIBED IN THIS
SUBSECTION (4)(b).
(5) ALL PROCEEDINGS BY A BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS IN
ELECTING FIVE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS IN A MANNER CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (3) OR (4) OF THIS SECTION ARE CONFIRMED AND VALIDATED.
(6) SIGNATURE REQUIREMENTS GOVERNING PETITIONS FOR A RACE
INVOLVING A SEAT ON THE BOARD OF COUNTY COMMISSIONERS ARE AS
SPECIFIED IN SECTION 1-4-801 FOR MAJOR POLITICAL PARTY CANDIDATES
AND SECTION 1-4-802 FOR CANDIDATES WHO DO NOT WISH TO AFFILIATE
WITH A MAJOR POLITICAL PARTY.
(7) A HOME RULE COUNTY IS EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION IF THE HOME RULE COUNTY ELECTS MORE THAN HALF OF ITS
COUNTY COMMISSIONERS BY A DISTRICT METHOD OF ELECTION, SUCH THAT
THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS ARE RESIDENT IN DISTRICTS AND ARE
ELECTED BY VOTERS RESIDENT IN THOSE DISTRICTS.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
-15- 1203

takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-16- 1203